Hawaii statutes.
§39-58 CUSIP numbers. The
department issuing revenue bonds pursuant to this part, in its discretion, may
provide that CUSIP identification numbers shall be imprinted on the revenue
bonds. In the event the numbers are imprinted on any revenue bonds:

(1) No CUSIP identification number shall constitute a
part of the contract evidenced by the particular revenue bond upon which it is
imprinted; and

(2) No liability shall attach to the State, the
department, or any officer or agent thereof, including any fiscal agent, paying
agent, or registrar for the revenue bonds, by reason of the numbers or any use
made thereof, and including any use made by the State, the department, any
officer or agent, or by reason of any inaccuracy, error, or omission.

The department in its discretion may require that
all cost of obtaining and imprinting the CUSIP identification numbers shall be
paid by the purchaser of the revenue bonds. For the purposes of this section,
the term "CUSIP identification numbers" means the numbering system
adopted by the Committee for Uniform Security Identification Procedures formed
by the Securities Industry Association. [L 1988, c 28, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next